Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1986, p. 534), the General Assembly designated the headquarters of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation as the “Phil Peters Building”.

35-3-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Bureau” means the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

“Director” means the director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-1

; Ga. L. 2005, p. 599, § 1/SB 146.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was created as part of the Code revision and was thus enacted by Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code Enactment Act).

35-3-2.
Creation.

There is created a Georgia Bureau of Investigation which shall be a separate department and agency of state government.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 1608, 1608.1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 109, § 2.

35-3-3.
Divisions of bureau.

The Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall be composed of the Investigations Division, the Forensic Sciences Division, the Georgia Crime Information Center Division, the Legal Division, and such other divisions as may be created by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 109, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 497, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 82, § 1/SB 393.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, inserted “the Legal Division,” in the middle of this Code section.

35-3-4.
Powers and duties of bureau generally.

It shall be the duty of the bureau to:

Take, receive, and forward fingerprints, photographs, descriptions, and measurements of persons in cooperation with the bureaus and departments of other states and of the United States;

Exchange information relating to crime and criminals;

Keep permanent files and records of such information procured or received;

Provide for the scientific investigation of articles used in committing crimes or articles, fingerprints, or bloodstains found at the scene of a crime;

Provide for the testing and identification of weapons and projectiles fired therefrom;

Acquire, collect, classify, and preserve any information which would assist in the identification of any deceased individual who has not been identified after the discovery of such deceased individual;

Acquire, collect, classify, and preserve immediately any information which would assist in the location of any missing person, including any minor, and provide confirmation as to any entry for such a person to the parent, legal guardian, or next of kin of that person and the bureau shall acquire, collect, classify, and preserve such information from such parent, guardian, or next of kin;

Exchange such records and information as provided in paragraphs (6) and (7) of this subsection with, and for the official use of, authorized officials of the federal government, the states, cities, counties, and penal and other institutions. With respect to missing minors, such information shall be transmitted immediately to other law enforcement agencies;

Identify and investigate violations of Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 16;

Identify and investigate violations of Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 12 of Title 16, relating to offenses related to minors;

Identify and investigate violations of Article 8 of Chapter 9 of Title 16;

Identify and investigate violations of Article 5 of Chapter 8 of Title 16;

Identify and investigate violations of Code Section 16-5-46;

Identify and investigate violations of Article 8 of Chapter 5 of Title 16;

Upon request, provide to the board an analysis of criminal history record information to assist the board in determining a sexual offender’s risk assessment classification in accordance with the board’s duties as specified in Code Section 42-1-14.

As used in this paragraph, the term:

“Board” means the Sexual Offender Registration Review Board.

“Criminal history record information” has the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 35-3-30.

“Risk assessment classification” means the level into which a sexual offender is placed based on the board’s assessment.

“Sexual offender” has the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 42-1-12;

Identify and investigate violations of Chapter 2 of Title 21 involving elections which if established are sufficient to change or place in doubt the results of an election; and

Attorneys employed by the Legal Division of the bureau may serve at the request of a district attorney, solicitor-general, or United States Attorney in the prosecution of any civil or criminal case within the jurisdiction of such district attorney, solicitor-general, or United States Attorney and, while providing such assistance to such district attorney, solicitor-general, or United States Attorney, such attorneys shall have the same authority and power as an attorney employed by such district attorney, solicitor-general, or United States Attorney.

In addition to the duties provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the members of the bureau shall have and are vested with the same authority, powers, and duties as are possessed by the members of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety under this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1941, p. 277, § 4; Ga. L. 1974, p. 109, § 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 752, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1984, p. 690, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 35; Ga. L. 1996, p. 416, § 9; Ga. L. 2007, p. 283, § 3/SB 98; Ga. L. 2008, p. 601, § 2/SB 388; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1162, § 2/SB 371; Ga. L. 2011, p. 217, § 9/HB 200; Ga. L. 2012, p. 351, § 5/HB 1110; Ga. L. 2012, p. 985, § 1/HB 895; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 3-5/HB 78; Ga. L. 2013, p. 1056, § 3/HB 122; Ga. L. 2020, p. 82, § 2/SB 393; Ga. L. 2021, p. 417, § 1/HB 495; Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 10/SB 441.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(14), substituted “; and” for a period at the end of division (a)(15)(B)(iii), and added paragraph (a)(16).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote paragraph (a)(15).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “and” from the end of division (a)(15)(B)(iv), added paragraph (a)(16), and redesignated former paragraph (a)(16) as present paragraph (a)(17).

Cross references.

Disposition of unclaimed dead bodies, § 31-21-20 et seq.

Authority of director of forensic sciences division to make facilities of division available for post-mortem examinations and autopsies and to authorize licensed physicians or pathologists to act as medical examiners in performing post-mortem examinations or autopsies, § 45-16-22.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, paragraph (a)(14), as enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 985, § 1/HB 895, was redesignated as paragraph (a)(15), “and” was deleted at the end of paragraph (a)(13), and “; and” was substituted for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(14).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 1/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) The state’s current system for sharing criminal case data is not adequate to provide to all appropriately interested parties, including, but not limited to, law enforcement agencies and officers, courts, crime victims and other impacted individuals, housing providers, and employers, complete criminal case data;

“(2) One recent report indicates there may be as many as 7 million criminal charges without a final disposition indicated, and, of those, as many as 5.4 million criminal charges have languished for years;

“(3) Georgia’s citizens and businesses are harmed by incomplete criminal case data. For example, in thousands of cases, as a result of incomplete criminal case data, citizens’ employability and housing opportunities have been negatively impacted; and

“(4) A more uniform, modern system and framework for handling criminal case data will support the state in meeting its obligations to victims to keep them informed as their perpetrators make their way through the criminal justice system.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that criminal case data be complete and accurately reported to the appropriate state data base and be accessible to state and local criminal justice agencies, employers, housing providers, victims, and all citizens.”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 2/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Criminal Records Responsibility Act.’”

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law on real property, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 283 (2010).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 131 (2011).

For article, “Crimes and Offenses:
Crimes Against the Person,” see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 131 (2011).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 39 (2012).

35-3-4.1.
Subpoena for production of electronic communication service records for computer or electronic device used in furtherance of certain offenses against minors.

In any investigation of a violation of Code Section 16-12-100, 16-12-100.1, or 16-12-100.2 involving the use of a computer or an electronic device in furtherance of an act related to a minor, or any investigation of a violation of Article 8 of Chapter 9 of Title 16, the director, assistant director, or deputy director for investigations shall be authorized to issue a subpoena, with the consent of the Attorney General, to compel the production of electronic communication service or remote communication service records or other information pertaining to a subscriber or customer of such service, exclusive of contents of communications.

A provider of electronic communication service or remote computing service shall disclose to the bureau the:

Name;

Address;

Local and long distance telephone connection records, or records of session times and durations;

Length of service, including the start date, and types of service utilized;

Telephone or instrument number or other subscriber number or identity, including any temporarily assigned network address; and

Means and source of payment for such service, including any credit card or bank account number of a subscriber to or customer of such service.

A provider of electronic communication service or remote computing service shall not provide notification of the subpoena issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection to the subscriber or customer of such service.

Upon failure of a person without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena, the director, assistant director, or the deputy director for investigations, through the Attorney General or district attorney, may apply to a superior court having jurisdiction for an order compelling compliance. Such person may object to the subpoena on grounds that it fails to comply with this Code section or upon any constitutional or other legal right or privilege of such person. The court may issue an order modifying or setting aside such subpoena or directing compliance with the original subpoena.

The Attorney General may request that a natural person who refuses to produce relevant matter on the ground that the production of records may incriminate such person be ordered by the court to provide such records. With the exception of a prosecution for perjury, a natural person who complies with the court order to provide such records asserting a privilege against self-incrimination to which he or she is entitled by law shall not be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or she may testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise.

Information obtained pursuant to a subpoena enforced by this Code section shall not be made public or, except as authorized in paragraph (2) of this subsection, disclosed by the director, assistant director, deputy director for investigations, or the director’s employees beyond the extent necessary for the enforcement of this Code section.

The director, assistant director, deputy director for investigations, or the director’s employees shall be authorized to provide to any federal, state, or local law enforcement agency any information acquired under this Code section in furtherance of a criminal investigation in violation of Code Section 16-12-100, 16-12-100.1, or 16-12-100.2.

As used in this Code section, the terms “electronic communication service” and “remote communication service” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-9-92.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 283, § 4/SB 98; Ga. L. 2008, p. 601, § 3/SB 388; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 1-1/SB 336.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added paragraph (a)(3).

Cross references.

Computer or electronic pornography and child exploitation prevention, §

16-12-100.2

.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).

35-3-4.2.
Subpoena authority for investigating fraudulent real estate transactions.

In any investigation of a violation of Article 5 of Chapter 8 of Title 16 or other criminal violations involving fraudulent real estate transactions, the director, assistant director, or deputy director for investigations shall be authorized to issue a subpoena, with the consent of the Attorney General, to compel the production of books, papers, documents, or other tangible things, including records and documents contained within, or generated by, a computer or any other electronic device.

Upon the failure of a person without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena, the director, assistant director, or the deputy director for investigations, through the Attorney General or district attorney, may apply to a superior court having jurisdiction for an order compelling compliance. Such person may object to the subpoena on grounds that it fails to comply with this Code section or upon any constitutional or other legal right or privilege of such person. The court may issue an order modifying or setting aside such subpoena or directing compliance with the original subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena issued under this Code section may be punished by the court as contempt of court.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-4.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1162, § 3/SB 371.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law on real property, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 283 (2010).

35-3-4.3.
Subpoena power for investigations of violations involving trafficking of persons for labor or sexual servitude.

In any investigation of a violation of Code Section 16-5-46 involving trafficking of persons for labor or sexual servitude, the director, assistant director, or deputy director for investigations shall be authorized to issue a subpoena, with the consent of the Attorney General, to compel the production of books, papers, documents, or other tangible things, including records and documents contained within, or generated by, a computer or any other electronic device.

A provider of electronic communication service or remote computing service shall not provide notification of the subpoena issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section to the subscriber or customer of such service.

Upon the failure of a person without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena, the director, assistant director, or the deputy director for investigations, through the Attorney General or district attorney, may apply to a superior court having jurisdiction for an order compelling compliance. Such person may object to the subpoena on grounds that it fails to comply with this Code section or upon any constitutional or other legal right or privilege of such person. The court may issue an order modifying or setting aside such subpoena or directing compliance with the original subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena issued under this Code section may be punished by the court as contempt of court.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-4.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 217, § 10/HB 200; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 1-2/SB 336.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added subsection (b); and redesignated former subsection (b) as present subsection (c).

Cross references.

Defense available for crimes committed while being trafficked, §

16-3-6

.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 enactment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 131 (2011).

For article, “Crimes and Offenses:
Crimes Against the Person,” see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 131 (2011).

35-3-4.4.
Issuance of a subpoena; failure to comply.

In any investigation of a violation of Article 8 of Chapter 5 of Title 16 or other criminal violation involving the abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a disabled adult, elder person, or resident, the director, assistant director, or deputy director for investigations shall be authorized to issue a subpoena, with the consent of the Attorney General, to compel the production of books, papers, documents, or other tangible things, including records and documents contained within, or generated by, a computer or any other electronic device, unless such records are wholly owned by the federal government.

Upon the failure of a person without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena, the director, assistant director, or deputy director for investigations, through the prosecuting attorney, may apply to a superior court having jurisdiction for an order compelling compliance. Such person may object to the subpoena on the grounds that it fails to comply with this Code section or upon any constitutional or other legal right or privilege of such person. The court may issue an order modifying or setting aside such subpoena or directing compliance with the original subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena issued under this Code section may be punished by the court as contempt of court.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-4.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 602, § 5/HB 635.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.

35-3-4.5.
Subpoena for voting records; audit; penalty for noncompliance.

In any investigation of a violation of Chapter 2 of Title 21 involving elections, the director, assistant director, or deputy director for investigations shall be authorized to issue a subpoena, with the consent of the Attorney General, to compel the production of books, papers, documents, or other tangible items, including records and documents contained within or generated by a computer or any other electronic device, unless such records are wholly owned by the federal government, and to undertake, at the discretion of the bureau, an audit of materials produced in response to such subpoena in a form deemed necessary by the bureau.

Upon failure of a person without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena, the director, assistant director, or deputy director for investigations, through the prosecuting attorney, may apply to a superior court having jurisdiction for an order compelling compliance. Such person may object to the subpoena on the grounds that it fails to comply with this Code section or upon any constitutional or other legal right or privilege of such person. The court may issue an order modifying or setting aside such subpoena or directing compliance with the original subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena issued under this Code section may be punished by the court as contempt of court.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-4.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 11/SB 441.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 1/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) The state’s current system for sharing criminal case data is not adequate to provide to all appropriately interested parties, including, but not limited to, law enforcement agencies and officers, courts, crime victims and other impacted individuals, housing providers, and employers, complete criminal case data;

“(2) One recent report indicates there may be as many as 7 million criminal charges without a final disposition indicated, and, of those, as many as 5.4 million criminal charges have languished for years;

“(3) Georgia’s citizens and businesses are harmed by incomplete criminal case data. For example, in thousands of cases, as a result of incomplete criminal case data, citizens’ employability and housing opportunities have been negatively impacted; and

“(4) A more uniform, modern system and framework for handling criminal case data will support the state in meeting its obligations to victims to keep them informed as their perpetrators make their way through the criminal justice system.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that criminal case data be complete and accurately reported to the appropriate state data base and be accessible to state and local criminal justice agencies, employers, housing providers, victims, and all citizens.”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 2/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Criminal Records Responsibility Act.’”

Cross references.

Voting and elections, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II.

35-3-5.
Director — Creation; appointment and removal; powers and duties.

There is created the position of director.

The director shall be the chief administrative officer and shall be both appointed and removed by the Board of Public Safety with the approval of the Governor.

The director shall coordinate and supervise the work of the Georgia Child Fatality Review Panel created by Code Section 19-15-4 or shall designate a person from within the bureau to serve as the coordinator and supervisor and shall provide such staffing and administrative support to the Georgia Child Fatality Review Panel as may be necessary to enable it to carry out its statutory duties.

The director shall report the death of any child to the chairperson of the review committee, as such term is defined in Code Section 19-15-1, for the county in which such child resided at the time of death, unless the director or his or her designee has knowledge that such death has been reported by the county medical examiner or coroner, pursuant to Code Section 19-15-3, and shall provide such review committee access to any records of the bureau relating to such child.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, and subject to the general policy established by the board, the director shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, administer, and execute the functions vested in the bureau by this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 109, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 599, § 2/SB 146; Ga. L. 2014, p. 34, § 2-8/SB 365.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 34, § 2-1/SB 365, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This part shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Journey Ann Cowart Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 34, § 2-9/SB 365, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide for transparency relative to investigations involving child abuse and child fatalities in order to best protect the children of this state.
The General Assembly finds that more disclosure of information may be necessary when a child is deceased.
The General Assembly intends that agencies and departments of this state share data in order to conduct research for the purpose of preventing child fatalities in this state.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 25 (2014).

35-3-6.
Director — Unclassified service; compensation.

The director shall be in the unclassified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2 and his or her compensation shall be fixed by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 109, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-50/HB 642.

Cross references.

State merit system generally, § 45-20-1 et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

35-3-7.
Agreements by director and commissioner for provision of services and material.

The director and the commissioner of public safety are authorized to enter into agreements, subject to approval of the Board of Public Safety, for the provision of such services, material, or combination thereof as may be useful in the performance of the official duties of the bureau or the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 109, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 2005, p. 599, § 3/SB 146.

Law reviews.

For article, “Administrative Law,” see 63 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (2011).

For article, “The Emory Law Volunteer Clinic for Veterans: Serving Those Who Served,” see 19 Ga. St. B.J. 26 (Feb. 2014).

35-3-8.
Powers of agents of bureau generally.

All properly appointed agents of the bureau shall have the powers, including the power of making arrests and appearing in court, for the enforcement of all criminal statutes pertaining to the manufacture, transportation, distribution, sale, or possession of liquor, wine, beer, alcoholic beverages, cigars, cigarettes, little cigars, cheroots, stogies, and loose or smokeless tobacco and shall concurrently with agents and enforcement officers appointed by the state revenue commissioner have the authority throughout the state to:

Obtain and execute warrants for the arrest of persons charged with violations of such laws;

Obtain and execute search warrants in the enforcement of such laws;

Arrest without warrant any person found in violation of such laws, or endeavoring to escape, or if for other cause there is likely to be a failure of enforcement of such laws for want of an officer to issue a warrant;

Make investigations in the enforcement of such laws and in connection therewith to go upon any property outside of buildings, posted or otherwise, in the performance of such duties;

Seize and take possession of all property which is declared contraband under such laws; and

Carry firearms while performing their duties.

The enforcement powers conferred in this Code section upon agents of the bureau shall relate only to the enforcement of the criminal provisions relating to the manufacture, transportation, distribution, sale, or possession of liquor, wine, beer, alcoholic beverages, cigars, cigarettes, little cigars, cheroots, stogies, and loose or smokeless tobacco and shall not extend to regulatory matters with respect to such products under the jurisdiction of the state revenue commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 420, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 2003, p. 665, § 42.

Cross references.

Powers and duties of state revenue commissioner relating to enforcement of laws pertaining to manufacture or transportation of alcoholic beverages, §

3-2-30

et seq.

Authority of agents of bureau with regard to laws pertaining to operation of vessels or boats upon waters of state, §

27-1-24

.

Powers and duties of state revenue commissioner relating to enforcement of laws pertaining to manufacture or transportation of cigars, cigarettes, and little cigars, §

48-11-19

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2003, p. 665, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘State and Local Tax Revision Act of 2003.’ ”

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 233 (2003).

35-3-8.1.
Power of bureau to assist other law enforcement agencies.

Upon request of the governing authority or chief law enforcement officer of any municipality, the sheriff of any county, the chief of the county police force of any county having a population of more than 100,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census, the judge of the superior court of any county of this state, or the Governor, the director, in unusual circumstances, may, and in the case of a request by the Governor, shall, direct the bureau to render assistance in any criminal case, in the prevention or detection of violations of law, or in the detection or apprehension of persons violating the criminal laws of this state, any other state, or the United States.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-8.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35.

35-3-9.
Narcotics agents.

The director is authorized to retain on a contractual basis such persons as he or she shall deem necessary to detect and apprehend violators of the criminal statutes of this state pertaining to the possession, sale, or use of narcotics or other dangerous drugs.

Those persons contracting with the director pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be known as narcotics agents.

The investigative services provided for in this Code section shall be designed to support local law enforcement efforts. The director shall, with the advice and consent of the board, appoint a three-member priority committee composed of a representative from the Georgia Sheriffs Association, the Georgia Association of Chiefs of Police, and the District Attorneys Association. The committee shall establish priorities for use of investigative resources and determine the bona fide nature of requests for assistance. The recommendations of the committee shall be followed by the director except where otherwise expressly authorized by the board.

Narcotics agents shall have all powers necessary and incidental to the fulfillment of their contractual obligations, including the power of arrest when authorized by the director.

No person shall be a narcotics agent unless he is at least 18 years of age.

The director shall conduct a background investigation of all potential narcotics agents. If the background investigation discloses a criminal record, the applicant shall not be retained without the express approval of the board.

Any matters pertaining to narcotics agents shall be exempt from Chapter 14 of Title 50, relating to meetings open to the public.

Persons retained as narcotics agents shall be considered persons in the service of the bureau under a contract of hire with that agency whose employment of those persons as narcotics agents shall be considered an employment in the usual course of the business of that agency. Persons retained by the bureau as narcotics agents shall have all the rights and privileges of other employees of the bureau; provided, however, that such persons shall be in the unclassified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2 and therefore shall not be governed by any rules of position, classification, appointment, promotion, demotion, transfer, dismissal, qualification, compensation, seniority privileges, tenure, or other such matters concerning their employment established by the State Personnel Board or any successor boards or agencies.

The director shall have all powers necessary and incidental to the effective operation of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 544, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 392, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1646, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1990, p. 540, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1058, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-51/HB 642.

Cross references.

Possession, sale, and use of controlled substances, T. 16, C. 13.

State merit system generally, § 45-20-1 et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

35-3-9.1.
[Repealed] Special Cocaine Task Force.

History.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 552, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 1985, p. 552, § 2, effective June 30, 1990.

35-3-9.2.
[Repealed] Mobile cocaine education van.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-9.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 552, § 3. Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 35/SB 465, repealed the reservation of this Code section designation; repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 599, § 1/SB 146, effective July 1, 2005.

35-3-10.
Participation by bureau personnel and director in Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

All personnel and the director of the bureau are authorized to be members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, as established by Chapter 2 of Title 47. All rights, credits, and funds in the retirement system which are possessed by any personnel of the bureau, including the director, at the time of employment in the bureau are continued; and it is the intention of the General Assembly that such personnel and the director shall not lose any rights, credits, or funds to which they were entitled prior to being employed with the bureau.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 109, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1058, § 2.

35-3-11.
Applicability of merit system to agents of bureau; retention of badge and weapon by disabled agent.

All agents of the bureau shall be governed by such rules of position, classification, appointment, promotion, demotion, transfer, dismissal, qualification, compensation, seniority privileges, tenure, and other employment standards as may now or hereafter be established under such merit system controls as may be authorized by Chapter 20 of Title 45.

This Code section shall not apply to narcotics agents as provided for in Code Section 35-3-9.

As used in this subsection, the term “disability” means a disability that prevents an individual from working as a law enforcement officer. When an agent of the bureau leaves the bureau as a result of a disability arising in the line of duty, such agent shall be entitled as part of such agent’s compensation to retain his or her weapon and badge pursuant to regulations promulgated by the director.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 109, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 1058, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-52/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

35-3-12.
Payment of medical and similar expenses of members injured in line of duty; procedure.

The bureau is authorized to pay all medical, surgical, hospital, nursing, and other similar expenses incurred by any member of the bureau as a result of injuries received in the line of duty. The bureau is authorized to make such payments in addition to any award made by the State Board of Workers’ Compensation based on such injuries. Such payments shall be made only upon proper presentation of bills to the bureau. The bureau and the injured party shall together ascertain the correctness of all bills presented. No payments shall be made without the approval of the bureau.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 392, § 1.

Cross references.

Workers’ compensation generally, T. 34, C. 9.

Insuring and indemnification of public officers and employees, T. 45, C. 9.

State Employees’ Health Insurance Plan, T. 45, C. 18, A. 1.

35-3-13.
Requests for investigation of criminal matters and crime related fires; access to local services and records.

Any district attorney of this state may request the assistance of the bureau to conduct and exercise its lawful powers and authorities in the investigation of any criminal matter.

Any head of a municipal or county fire department may request the assistance of the bureau to conduct and exercise its lawful powers and authorities in the investigation of any crime related fires.

In the event the bureau acts in cooperation with a municipality or other political subdivision of the state, the services and records of such municipality or other subdivision shall be accessible and available to the bureau at all times.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1941, p. 277, § 4; Ga. L. 1977, p. 752, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 254, § 2.

35-3-14.
Bureau to publicly post and share on website certain information from Law Enforcement Notification System of United States Department of Homeland Security.

To the extent permitted by federal law, the bureau shall post on its public website the information of persons who are aliens and who have been released from federal custody within the boundaries of this state, as such information is presented within the Law Enforcement Notification System of the Enforcement Integrated Database of the United States Department of Homeland Security or the National Law Enforcement Telecommunications System as received by the Georgia Information Sharing and Analysis Center within the bureau or any replacement agency. Within 12 hours of receiving such information, the bureau shall post such information as required by this Code section and electronically send a copy of such information to the Georgia Sheriffs’ Association. The bureau shall promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 536, § 5-2/HB 452.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 35-3-14, concerning reimbursement of the director of Division of Forensic Sciences for use of the director’s private aircraft, was based on
Ga. L. 1974, p. 563, § 1, and was repealed by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 2, effective May 1, 1997.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 536, § 1-1/HB 452, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Protect Georgia Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2017 enactment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 17 (2017).

35-3-15 and 35-3-16.
[Repealed]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 2, effective May 1, 1997.

Editor’s notes.

These Code sections were based on Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 1; Ga. 1994, p. 875, § 1.